Idaho statutes. Title 39 HEALTH AND SAFETY
Chapter 36
WATER QUALITY

Sec.

§ 39-3601. Declaration of policy and statement of legislative intent.

The legislature, recognizing that surface water is one of the state’s most valuable natural resources, has approved the adoption of water quality standards and authorized the director of the department of environmental quality in accordance with the provisions of this chapter, to implement these standards. In order to maintain and achieve existing and designated beneficial uses and to conform to the expressed intent of congress to control pollution of navigable waters of the United States, the legislature declares that it is the purpose of this chapter to enhance and preserve the quality and value of the navigable waters of the United States within the state of Idaho, and to define the responsibilities of public agencies in the control, and monitoring of water pollution, and, through implementation of this chapter, enhance the state’s economic well-being. In consequence of the benefits resulting to the public health, welfare and economy, it is hereby declared to be the policy of the state of Idaho to protect this natural resource by monitoring and controlling water pollution; to support and aid technical and planning research leading to the control of water pollution, and to provide financial and technical assistance to municipalities, soil conservation districts and other agencies in the control of water pollution. The director, in cooperation with such other agencies as may be appropriate, shall administer this chapter. It is the intent of the legislature that the state of Idaho fully meet the goals and requirements of the federal clean water act and that the rules promulgated under this chapter not impose requirements beyond those of the federal clean water act.

§ 39-3602. Definitions.

Whenever used or referred to in this chapter, unless a different meaning clearly appears from the context, the following terms shall have the following meanings:

“Applicable water quality standard” means those water quality standards identified in the rules of the department.

“Attainable” beneficial uses means uses that can be achieved by the implementation of required effluent limits for point sources and cost-effective and reasonable best management practices for nonpoint sources.

“Best management practice” means practices, techniques or measures developed, or identified, by the designated agency and identified in the state water quality management plan which are determined to be a cost-effective and practicable means of preventing or reducing pollutants generated from nonpoint sources to a level compatible with water quality goals.

“Board” means the board of environmental quality.

“Consult” or “consultation” with basin advisory groups and watershed advisory groups, when not otherwise defined in this chapter, means that the director shall:

Upon request, provide the groups with all available information in the possession of the department concerning the subject of the consultation;

Utilize the knowledge, expertise, experience and information of the groups in making the determination that is the subject of the consultation; and

Consider the groups’ recommendations regarding the determination that is the subject of the consultation.

“Control strategies” means cost-effective actions in TMDL implementation plans to control the discharge of pollutants that can reasonably be taken to improve the water quality within the physical, operational, economic and other constraints that affect individual enterprises and communities.

“Degradation” or “lower water quality” means, for purposes of antidegradation review, a change in a pollutant that is adverse to designated or existing uses, as calculated for a new point source, and based upon monitoring or calculated information for an existing point source increasing its discharge. Such degradation shall be calculated or measured after appropriate mixing of the discharge and receiving water body.

“Department” means the department of environmental quality.

“Designated agency” means the department of lands for timber harvest activities, for oil and gas exploration and development and for mining activities; the soil and water conservation commission for grazing activities and for agricultural activities; the transportation department for public road construction; the department of agriculture for aquaculture; and the department of environmental quality for all other activities.

“Designated use or designated beneficial use” means those uses assigned to waters as identified in the rules of the department whether or not the uses are being attained. The department may adopt subcategories of a use.

“Director” means the director of the department of environmental quality, or his or her designee.

“Discharge” means any spilling, leaking, emitting, escaping, leaching, or disposing of a pollutant into the waters of the state. For the purposes of this chapter, discharge shall not include surface water runoff from nonpoint sources or natural soil disturbing events.
(13) “Existing use” means those surface water uses actually attained on or after November 28, 1975, whether or not they are designated uses. Existing uses may form the basis for subcategories of designated uses.

The minimum biological, physical and chemical conditions necessary to fully support the designated beneficial uses; or

A water body representing natural conditions with few impacts from human activities and which are representative of the highest level of support attainable in the basin; or

A water body representing minimum conditions necessary to fully support the designated beneficial uses.

(14) “Full protection, full support, or full maintenance of designated beneficial uses of water” means compliance with those levels of water quality criteria listed in the appropriate rules of the department, or where there is no applicable numerical criteria, compliance with the reference streams or conditions approved by the director in consultation with the appropriate basin advisory group.

(15) “General permit” means an NPDES permit issued by the U.S. environmental protection agency authorizing a category of discharges under the federal clean water act or a nationwide or regional permit issued by the U.S. army corps of engineers under the federal clean water act.

(16) “Integrated report” means the consolidated listing and reporting of the state’s water quality status pursuant to the federal clean water act.

(17) “National pollutant discharge elimination system (NPDES)” means the point source permitting program established pursuant to section 402 of the federal clean water act.

(18) “New nonpoint source activity” means a new nonpoint source activity or a substantially modified existing nonpoint source activity on or adversely affecting an outstanding resource water which includes, but is not limited to, new silvicultural activities, new mining activities and substantial modifications to an existing mining permit or approved plan, new recreational activities and substantial modifications to existing recreational activities, new residential or commercial development that includes soil disturbing activities, new grazing activities and substantial modifications to existing grazing activities, except that reissuance of existing grazing permits, or grazing activities and practices authorized under an existing permit, is not considered a new activity. It does not include naturally occurring events such as floods, landslides, and wildfire including prescribed natural fire.

(19) “Nonpoint source activities” includes grazing, crop production, silviculture, log storage or rafting, construction, mining, recreation, septic systems, runoff from storms and other weather related events and other activities not subject to regulation under the federal national pollutant discharge elimination system. Nonpoint source activities on waters designated as outstanding resource waters do not include issuance of water rights permits or licenses, allocation of water rights, operation of diversions, or impoundments.

(20) “Nonpoint source runoff” means water which may carry pollutants from nonpoint source activities into the waters of the state.

(21) “Outstanding resource water” means a high quality water, such as water of national and state parks and wildlife refuges and water of exceptional recreational or ecological significance, which has been so designated by the legislature. It constitutes an outstanding national or state resource that requires protection from point source and nonpoint source activities that may lower water quality.

(22) “Person” means any individual, association, partnership, firm, joint stock company, joint venture, trust, estate, political subdivision, public or private corporation, state or federal governmental department, agency or instrumentality, or any legal entity, which is recognized by law as the subject of rights and duties.

(23) “Point source” means any discernible, confined, and discrete conveyance including, but not limited to, any pipe, ditch, channel, tunnel, conduit, well, discrete fissure, container, rolling stock, concentrated animal feeding operation, or vessel or other floating craft, from which pollutants are, or may be, discharged. This term does not include return flows from irrigated agriculture, discharges from dams and hydroelectric generating facilities or any source or activity considered a nonpoint source by definition.
(24) “Pollutant” means dredged spoil, solid waste, incinerator residue, sewage, garbage, sewage sludge, munitions, chemical waste, biological materials, radioactive materials, heat, wrecked or discarded equipment, rock, sand, silt, cellar dirt; and industrial, municipal and agricultural waste, gases entrained in water; or other materials which, when discharged or released to water in excessive quantities cause or contribute to water pollution. Provided however, biological materials shall not include live or occasional dead fish that may accidentally escape into the waters of the state from aquaculture facilities.

(25) “Reference stream or condition” means one (1) of the following:

In highly mineralized areas or in the absence of such reference streams or water bodies, the director, in consultation with the basin advisory group and the technical advisers to it, may define appropriate hypothetical reference conditions or may use monitoring data specific to the site in question to determine conditions in which the beneficial uses are fully supported.

(26) “Short-term or temporary activity” means an activity which is limited in scope and is expected to have only minimal impact on water quality as determined by the director. Short-term or temporary activities include, but are not limited to, maintenance of existing structures, limited road and trail reconstruction, soil stabilization measures, and habitat enhancement structures.

(27) “Silviculture” means those activities associated with the regeneration, growing and harvesting of trees and timber including, but not limited to, disposal of logging slash, preparing sites for new stands of trees to be either planted or allowed to regenerate through natural means, road construction and road maintenance, drainage of surface water which inhibits tree growth or logging operations, fertilization, application of herbicides or pesticides, all logging operations, and all forest management techniques employed to enhance the growth of stands of trees or timber.

(28) “Soil and water conservation commission” means an agency of state government as created in section 22-2718, Idaho Code.

(29) “Soil conservation district” means an entity of state government as defined in section 22-2717, Idaho Code.

(30) “State” means the state of Idaho.

(31) “State water quality management plan” means the state management plan developed and updated by the department in accordance with sections 205, 208, and 303 of the federal clean water act.

(32) “Subbasin assessment” means a document that describes a watershed or watersheds for which a total maximum daily load is proposed, the water quality concerns, the status and attainability of designated uses and water quality criteria for individual water bodies, the nature and location of pollutant sources, past and ongoing pollutant control activities, and such other information that the director with the advice of the local watershed advisory group determines is pertinent to the analysis of water quality and the development and implementation of a total maximum daily load.
(33) “Total maximum daily load (TMDL)” means a plan for a water body not fully supporting designated beneficial uses and includes the sum of the individual wasteload allocations for point sources, load allocations for nonpoint sources, and natural background levels of the pollutant impacting the water body. Pollutant allocations established through TMDLs shall be at a level necessary to implement the applicable water quality standards for the identified pollutants with seasonal variations and a margin of safety to account for uncertainty concerning the relationship between the pollutant loading and water quality standards.

(34) “Waters or water body” means the navigable waters of the United States as defined in the federal clean water act. For the purposes of this chapter, water bodies shall not include municipal or industrial wastewater treatment or storage structures or private reservoirs, the operation of which has no effect on waters.

(35) “Water pollution” is such alteration of the thermal, chemical, biological or radioactive properties of any waters of the state, or such discharge or release of any contaminant into the waters of the state as will or is likely to create a nuisance or render such waters harmful or detrimental or injurious to public health, safety or welfare or to domestic, commercial, industrial, recreational, aesthetic or other legitimate uses or to livestock, wild animals, birds, fish or other aquatic life.

(36) “Water quality standards” are the designated uses of a water body and water quality criteria necessary to support those uses, and an antidegradation policy.

(37) “Watersheds” means the land area from which water flows into a stream or other body of water which drains the area. For the purposes of this chapter, the area of watersheds shall be recommended by the basin advisory group described in section 39-3613, Idaho Code.

§ 39-3603. Antidegradation policy and implementation.

Policy.

Maintenance of existing uses for all waters — Tier I protection. The existing instream beneficial uses of each water body and the level of water quality necessary to protect those uses shall be maintained and protected.

High quality waters — Tier II protection. Where the quality of waters exceeds levels necessary to support propagation of fish, shellfish and wildlife and recreation in and on the water, that quality shall be maintained unless the department finds, after full satisfaction of the intergovernmental coordination and public participation provisions of this chapter, and the department’s planning processes, along with appropriate planning processes of other agencies, that lowering water quality is necessary to accommodate important economic or social development in the area in which the waters are located. In allowing such reductions in water quality, the department shall assure water quality adequate to protect existing uses fully.

Outstanding resource waters — Tier III protection. Where an outstanding resource water has been designated by the legislature that water quality shall be maintained and protected from the impacts of point and nonpoint source activities.

Implementation.

General permits. For general permits issued on or after July 1, 2011, the department will conduct an antidegradation review, including any required Tier II analysis, at the time at which general permits are certified. For general permits that the department determines adequately address antidegradation, review of individual applications for coverage will not be required unless it is required by the general permit. For general permits that the department determines do not adequately address antidegradation, the department may conclude that other conditions, such as the submittal of additional information or individual certification at the time an application is submitted for coverage under a general permit, may be necessary in the general permit to provide reasonable assurance of compliance with the antidegradation policy. If supported by the permit record, the department may also presume that discharges authorized under a general permit are insignificant or that the pollution controls required in the general permit are the least degrading alternative as specified in the department’s rules.

Identification of Tier II waters. The department will utilize a water body by water body approach in determining where Tier II protection is appropriate in addition to Tier I protection. This approach shall be based on an assessment of the chemical, physical, biological and other information regarding the water body. The most recent federally approved integrated report and supporting data will be used to determine the appropriate level of protection as follows:

Water bodies identified in the integrated report as fully supporting assessed uses will be provided Tier II protection.

Water bodies identified in the integrated report as not assessed will be provided an appropriate level of protection on a case-by-case basis using information available at the time of a proposal for a new or reissued permit or license.

Water bodies identified in the integrated report as not fully supporting assessed uses will receive Tier I protection for the impaired aquatic life or recreational use, except as follows:

For aquatic life uses identified as impaired for dissolved oxygen, pH or temperature, if biological or aquatic habitat parameters show a healthy, balanced biological community is present, as described in the water body assessment guidance published by the department, then the water body shall receive Tier II protection for aquatic life.
2. For recreational uses, if water quality data show compliance with those levels of water quality criteria listed in the department’s rules, then the water body shall receive Tier II protection for recreational uses.

Special resource waters listed in the department’s rules shall be evaluated in the same fashion as all other waters.

Tier II analysis for insignificant degradation. If the department determines an activity or discharge will cause degradation, then the department shall determine whether the degradation is insignificant.

A cumulative decrease in assimilative capacity of more than ten percent (10%), from conditions as of July 1, 2011, shall constitute significant degradation. If the cumulative decrease in assimilative capacity from conditions as of July 1, 2011, is equal to or less than ten percent (10%), then, taking into consideration the size and character of the activity or discharge and the magnitude of its effect on the receiving stream, the department may determine that the degradation is insignificant.

The department may request additional information from the applicant as needed to determine the significance of the degradation.

If degradation is determined to be insignificant, then no further Tier II analysis for other source controls, alternatives analysis or socioeconomic justification is required.

§ 39-3604. Designation of instream beneficial uses.

The director shall designate the beneficial uses each surface water body can reasonably be expected to attain.

Designated beneficial uses shall reflect existing uses. The director shall designate beneficial uses without regard to whether the uses are currently being attained or whether the uses are fully supported at the time of designation. In designating beneficial uses, the director shall consider:

The existing uses of the water body;

The physical, geological, hydrological, atmospheric, chemical and biological measures that affect the water body;

The beneficial use attainability measures identified in section 39-3607, Idaho Code; and

The economic impact of the designation and the economic costs required to fully support the beneficial uses.

When designating beneficial uses for a water body, the director shall consult with the basin advisory group and the watershed advisory group with the responsibilities described in this chapter for the water body. After consultation, the director shall identify the designated beneficial uses of each water body in the rules of the department pursuant to the rulemaking and public participation provisions of chapter 52, title 67, Idaho Code.

Persons who either conduct nonpoint activities or who conduct operations on waters described in section 39-3609, Idaho Code, pursuant to a national pollution discharge elimination system permit, shall not be required to meet water quality criteria other than those necessary for the full support of a water body’s existing and designated beneficial uses, except as provided in section 39-3611, Idaho Code.

§ 39-3605. Identification of reference streams or conditions.

The director shall, in consultation with the appropriate basin advisory group, identify reference streams or conditions to assist in determining whether the designated beneficial uses of water bodies within a basin are being fully supported. Streams or conditions shall be selected to represent the land types, land uses, hydrology, water uses and geophysical features within the basins described in this chapter. Reference streams or conditions shall be representative of one (1) of the following:

A stream or other water body reflecting natural conditions with few impacts from human activities and which is representative of the highest level of support attainable in the basin; or

A stream or water body reflecting the minimum conditions necessary to fully support the designated beneficial uses of the stream or water body; or

Physical, chemical and biological indicators identified in the rules of the department which reflect full support of designated beneficial uses.

§ 39-3605B. [Amended and redesignated.]

§ 39-3605C. Environmental remediation fund established.

There is hereby created in the state treasury a fund to be known as the environmental remediation fund. Surplus moneys in the environmental remediation fund shall be invested by the state treasurer in the manner provided for idle state moneys in the state treasury under section 67-1210, Idaho Code. Interest received on all such investments shall be paid into the environmental remediation fund. The fund may have paid into it:

Legislative appropriations and transfers from other funds;

All donations and grants from any source which may be used for the provisions of this act;

Any other funds which may hereafter be provided by law.

§ 39-3606. Monitoring and use of reference streams or conditions and beneficial use support assessment.

The director shall conduct monitoring to determine whether designated beneficial uses of water bodies are fully supported. In making such determinations, the director shall consult with the basin advisory group and the watershed advisory group with the responsibilities described in this chapter for the water body. The director shall use the appropriate water quality standards as identified in the rules of the department and shall compare the physical, chemical and biological measures of the water body with the reference stream or condition appropriate to the land type, land uses, hydrology, water uses and geophysical features of the water body as described in section 39-3605(2), Idaho Code. If the water body has such physical, chemical or biological measures as the reference stream or condition, even though such measures may be diminished from the conditions set forth in section 39-3605(1), Idaho Code, then the director shall deem the designated beneficial uses for the water body to be fully supported and as having achieved the objectives of the federal clean water act and of this chapter. When site-specific standards have been developed for an activity pursuant to the rules of the department, the use of reference streams as described in this section shall not be necessary.

The physical, geological, hydrological, atmospheric, chemical or biological measures of a water body to be used to determine whether beneficial uses are fully supported may include, but are not limited to: stream width, stream depth, stream shade, sediment, bank stability, water flows, physical characteristics of the stream that affect habitat for fish, macroinvertebrate species or other aquatic life, and the variety and number of fish or other aquatic life.

§ 39-3606A. [Amended and redesignated.]

§ 39-3606B. [Amended and redesignated.]

§ 39-3606C. Appropriation of environmental remediation fund — Purpose of chapter.

Moneys in the environmental remediation fund may be used for annual legislative appropriations for the purpose of environmental cleanup and remediation and restoration in, but not limited to, the following areas:

To provide the state’s matching share of grants for remediation including superfund grants;

To provide for the operations of remediation activities.

§ 39-3607. Revisions and attainability of beneficial uses.

The director shall, in consultation with the appropriate basin advisory group and watershed advisory group, conduct a beneficial use attainability assessment to determine whether beneficial uses should be revised. Designated uses shall be reviewed and revised when such physical, geological, hydrological, atmospheric, chemical or biological measures indicate the need to do so. The director shall consider the economic costs required to attain a revised beneficial use. A designated use, that is not an existing use, shall be removed when it is demonstrated that attaining the use is not feasible, using those factors set forth in 40 CFR 131.10(g).

Previous assessments of beneficial use attainability that are of a quality and content acceptable to the director shall constitute the baseline data against which future assessments shall be made to determine changes in the water body and what beneficial uses can be attained in it. In addition, the director, to the extent possible, may determine whether changes in the condition of the water body are the result of past or ongoing point or nonpoint source activities. The director shall also seek information from appropriate public agencies regarding land uses, water uses and geological or other information for the watershed that may affect water quality and the ability of the water body in question to attain designated beneficial uses. In carrying out the provisions of this section, the director may contract with private enterprises or public agencies to provide the desired data.

§ 39-3608. Regulatory actions for water bodies where beneficial uses are fully supported.

For streams or other water bodies where the director has determined that designated beneficial uses are being fully supported, the director shall assure, in a manner consistent with other existing applicable statutes, and rules, that all programs deemed necessary to maintain full support of designated beneficial uses are employed. In providing such assurances, the director may enter together into an agreement with public agencies in accordance with sections 67-2326 through 67-2333, Idaho Code.

§ 39-3609. Identification of water bodies where beneficial uses are not fully supported.

In accordance with the provisions set forth in the federal clean water act and after consultation with the appropriate basin advisory group and watershed advisory group, the director shall notify the appropriate public agencies of any water bodies in which the designated beneficial uses are not fully supported. For water bodies so identified, the director shall place such water bodies into one (1) of the following priority classifications for the development of total maximum daily load or equivalent processes:

“High.” The director shall place water bodies in this category taking into account the availability and quality of data, department resources, and whether the severity of pollution poses a significant risk to designated or existing beneficial uses. The director, in establishing this category, shall consider public involvement as set forth in this chapter.

“Medium.” The director shall place water bodies in this category taking into account the availability and quality of data, department resources, and whether the severity of the pollution poses a risk to designated or existing beneficial uses.

“Low.” The director shall place water bodies in this category taking into account the availability and quality of data, department resources, and whether the severity of pollution poses a minimal risk to designated or existing beneficial uses.

§ 39-3610. General limitations on point and nonpoint sources for water bodies not fully supporting beneficial uses.

The director shall assure, in a manner consistent with existing statutes or rules, that for each category of water body, as described in section 39-3609(1) through (3), Idaho Code, the following limitations shall apply:

For waters in the “high,” category a total maximum daily load or equivalent process as described in this chapter shall be undertaken. Provided however, that nothing in this section shall be interpreted as requiring best management practices for agricultural operations which are not adopted on a voluntary basis.

For waters in the “medium” category, such changes in permitted discharges from point sources on the water body or to the best management practices for nonpoint sources within the watershed deemed necessary to prohibit further impairment of the designated or existing beneficial uses.

For waters in the “low” category, such changes in permitted discharges from point sources on the water body or to the best management practices for nonpoint sources within the watershed deemed necessary to prohibit further impairment of the designated or existing beneficial uses.

§ 39-3611. Development and implementation of total maximum daily load or equivalent processes.

For water bodies described in section 39-3609, Idaho Code, the director shall, in accordance with the priorities set forth in section 39-3610, Idaho Code, and in accordance with sections 39-3614 through 39-3616, Idaho Code, and as required by the federal clean water act, prepare a subbasin assessment and develop a total maximum daily load to allocate pollutant loads to point source and nonpoint sources that discharge pollutants to the water body.

Upon the completion of a total maximum daily load, the director shall publish notice of the final decision on the TMDL in the Idaho administrative bulletin and provide written notice to members of the applicable watershed advisory group. The director’s final decision shall be based upon a record that provides the basis for the total maximum daily load. The rulemaking provisions in sections 67-5220 through 67-5231, Idaho Code, shall not apply to TMDLs. The director’s final decision regarding a TMDL may be appealed to the board of environmental quality in accordance with section 39-107(5), Idaho Code, and the rules governing such appeals. The time for appeal to the board shall commence upon publication in the administrative bulletin. The board’s final decision is subject to judicial review under section 39-107(6), Idaho Code. The provisions of this subsection shall apply to all total maximum daily loads developed by the director after January 1, 1995. Provided however, that the rulemaking provisions in sections 67-5220 through 67-5231, Idaho Code, shall apply to TMDLs for metals in the Coeur d’Alene River Basin, upstream from the head of the Spokane River. Provided further, that nothing herein shall modify the requirement that water quality standards be promulgated as rules of the department pursuant to title 67, chapter 52, Idaho Code.

For water bodies where an applicable water quality standard has not been attained due to impacts that occurred prior to 1972, no further restrictions under a total maximum daily load process shall be placed on a point source discharge unless the point source contribution of a pollutant exceeds twenty-five percent (25%) of the total load for that pollutant. Existing uses shall be maintained on all such water bodies.

Subbasin assessments and total maximum daily load processes developed pursuant to this section shall include, but not be limited to:

Identification of pollutant(s) impacting the water body;

An inventory of all point and nonpoint sources of the identified pollutant(s), if practical, or an analysis of the land types, land uses and geographical features within the watershed that may be contributing identified pollutants to the water body;

An analysis of why current control strategies are not effective in assuring full support of designated beneficial uses;

A plan to monitor and evaluate progress toward meeting water quality standards;

Pollution control strategies for both point sources and nonpoint sources;

Identification of the period of time necessary to achieve full support of designated beneficial uses through implementation of pollution control strategies, which takes into account any expected changes to applicable water quality standards; and

An adequate margin of safety to account for uncertainty.
(5) Point source discharges for which a national pollutant discharge elimination system permit is approved after January 1, 1995, shall be deemed to have met the requirements of this section.

(6) No instream target for a pollutant shall be set as part of a TMDL process unless the data and analysis in the subbasin assessment demonstrate that the pollutant is causing or contributing to a violation of a water quality standard in the stream for which the TMDL is being developed. If a pollutant load is allocated to a tributary inflow as part of a downstream TMDL, the director shall develop a plan to meet such allocation in consultation with the tributary watershed advisory group as provided in subsection (8) of this section.

(7) The director shall review and reevaluate each TMDL, supporting subbasin assessment, implementation plan(s) and all available data periodically at intervals of no greater than five (5) years. Such reviews shall include the assessments required by section 39-3607, Idaho Code, and an evaluation of the water quality criteria, instream targets, pollutant allocations, assumptions and analyses upon which the TMDL and subbasin assessment were based. If the members of the watershed advisory group, with the concurrence of the basin advisory group, advise the director that the water quality standards, the subbasin assessment, or the implementation plan(s) are not attainable or are inappropriate based upon supporting data, the director shall initiate the process or processes to determine whether to make recommended modifications. The director shall report to the legislature annually the results of such reviews.

(8) Each TMDL and any supporting subbasin assessment shall be developed and periodically reviewed and modified in consultation with the watershed advisory group for the watershed in which the water bodies are located. Consultation shall include, but not be limited to:

(a) Upon request, providing the watershed advisory group with all available information in the possession of the department concerning applicable water quality standards, water quality data, monitoring, assessments, reports, procedures and schedules for developing and submitting the TMDL and any supporting subbasin assessment to the United States environmental protection agency;

(b) Utilizing the knowledge, expertise, experience and information of the watershed advisory group in assessing the status, attainability or appropriateness of water quality standards, and in developing a TMDL and any supporting subbasin assessment; and

(c) Providing the watershed advisory group with an adequate opportunity to participate in drafting the documents for the TMDL and any supporting subbasin assessment and to suggest changes to the documents.

(9) No TMDL shall be published for public comment or submitted for approval to the United States environmental protection agency until consultation, as herein provided, has occurred. If, after consultation, the watershed advisory group disagrees with the TMDL or any supporting subbasin assessment, or has determined that applicable water quality standards should be reevaluated or revised, such position and the basis therefor shall be documented in the public notice of availability to the TMDL and any supporting subbasin assessment for review, and in any submission of the same to the United States environmental protection agency. The director shall respond to the points raised by the watershed advisory group and shall document the response in the final decision.

§ 39-3612. Integration of total maximum daily load processes with other programs.

Upon completion of total maximum daily load processes as set forth in section 39-3611, Idaho Code, the director shall integrate such processes into the state’s water quality management plan developed pursuant to the federal clean water act. Total maximum daily load processes shall be used by all designated agencies for achieving water quality standards.

§ 39-3613. Creation of basin advisory groups.

The director, in consultation with the designated agencies, shall name, for each of the state’s major river basins, no less than one (1) basin advisory group which shall generally advise the director on water quality objectives for each basin and work in a cooperative manner with the director to achieve these objectives. Each such group shall establish by majority vote, operating procedures to guide the work of the group. Members shall be compensated pursuant to section 59-509(c), Idaho Code. The membership of each basin advisory group shall be representative of the industries and interests directly affected by the implementation of water quality programs within the basin and each member of the group shall either reside within the basin or represent persons with a real property interest within the basin. Recognized groups representing those industries or interests in the basin may nominate members of the group to the director. Each basin advisory group named by the director shall reflect a balanced representation of the interests in the basin and shall, where appropriate, include a representative from each of the following: agriculture, mining, nonmunicipal point source discharge permittees, forest products, local government, livestock, Indian tribes (for areas within reservation boundaries), water-based recreation, and environmental interests. In addition, the director shall name one (1) person to represent the public at large who may reside outside the basin. Members named to the basin advisory groups shall, in the opinion of the director, have demonstrated interest or expertise which will be of benefit to the work of the basin advisory group. The director may also name as may be needed those who have expertise necessary to assist in the work of the basin advisory group who shall serve as technical nonvoting advisers to the basin advisory group.